Missouri, session 2026, HB2040.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 565.150 and 565.153, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 565.150 and 565.153, to read as follows:
565.150. 1. A person commits the offense of interference with custody if, knowing
that he or she has no legal right to do so, he or she takes or entices from legal custody any
person entrusted by order of a court to the custody of another person or institution.
2. The offense of interference with custody is a class [A misdemeanor] E felony
unless the person taken or enticed away from legal custody is removed from this state,
detained in another state or concealed, in which case it is a class [E] D felony.
3. Upon a finding of guilt for an offense under this section, the court may, in addition
to or in lieu of any sentence or fine imposed, assess as restitution against the defendant and in
favor of the legal custodian or parent, any reasonable expenses incurred by the legal custodian
or parent in searching for or returning the child.
565.153. 1. In the absence of a court order determining rights of custody or visitation
to a child, a person having a right of custody of the child commits the offense of parental
kidnapping if he or she removes, takes, detains, conceals, or entices away that child within or
without the state, without good cause, and with the intent to deprive the custody right of
another person or a public agency also having a custody right to that child.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2040 2
2. Parental kidnapping is a class [E] D felony, unless committed by detaining or
concealing the whereabouts of the child for:
(1) Not less than sixty days but not longer than one hundred nineteen days, in which
case, the offense is a class [D] C felony;
(2) Not less than one hundred twenty days, in which case, the offense is a class B
felony.
3. A subsequently obtained court order for custody or visitation shall not affect the
application of this section.
4. Upon a finding of guilt for an offense under this section, the court may, in addition
to or in lieu of any sentence or fine imposed, assess as restitution against the defendant and in
favor of the legal custodian or parent, any reasonable expenses incurred by the legal custodian
or parent in searching for or returning the child.
✔